Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1317.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1716-D(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1716-D. Limitations.(a) Cap.--Except for tax credits reissued under section 1716.1-D, in no case shall the aggregate amount of tax credits awarded in any fiscal year under this subarticle exceed [$100,000,000] $125,000,000. The department may, in its 123456789101112131415161718192021 discretion, award in one fiscal year up to:(1) Thirty percent of the dollar amount of film production tax credits available to be awarded in the next succeeding fiscal year.(2) Twenty percent of the dollar amount of film production tax credits available to be awarded in the second successive fiscal year.(3) Ten percent of the dollar amount of film production tax credits available to be awarded in the third successive fiscal year.* * *Section 2. The amendment of section 1716-D(a) of the act shall apply to fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1317PN1510 - 2 - 1234567891011121314